Hawaii statutes.
§412:2-105.2 Hawaii financial institutions;
assessments; fees; penalty. (a) Beginning January 1, 2014, every Hawaii
financial institution shall be assessed a yearly fee in accordance with the
following:

(1) For financial institutions with total assets
under $750,000, the assessment shall be the sum of $1,000 plus the product of
0.00029111 times total assets;

(2) For financial institutions with total assets of
at least $750,000 but under $7,500,000, the assessment shall be the sum of
$2,000 plus the product of 0.00029111 times total assets;

(3) For financial institutions with total assets of
at least $7,500,000 but under $20,000,000, the assessment shall be the sum of
$4,800 plus the product of 0.00029111 times total assets;

(4) For financial institutions with total assets of
at least $20,000,000 but under $75,000,000, the assessment shall be the sum of
$9,900 plus the product of 0.000064 times total assets;

(5) For financial institutions with total assets of
at least $75,000,000 but under $200,000,000, the assessment shall be the sum of
$15,000 plus the product of 0.00005333 times total assets;

(6) For financial institutions with total assets of
at least $200,000,000 but under $1,000,000,000, the assessment shall be the sum
of $21,100 plus the product of 0.00004750 times total assets;

(7) For financial institutions with total assets of
at least $1,000,000,000 but under $20,000,000,000, the assessment shall be the
sum of $29,000 plus the product of 0.00004 times total assets;

provided that the yearly fee assessed for financial
institutions with total assets of at least $2,000,000,000 but less than
$10,000,000,000 shall be no more than $100,000, and the yearly fee assessed for
financial institutions with total assets of at least $10,000,000,000 shall be
no more than $150,000.

(b) The assessments shall be paid semiannually
on March 1 and September 1 of each year based on the institution's total assets
reported as of the previous December 31 and June 30, respectively.

(c) In addition to the assessments established
in subsection (a), a financial institution or financial institution applicant
shall pay fees as follows:

(1) A nonrefundable fee of $10,000 for an application
for preliminary approval by the commissioner for the organization of a Hawaii
financial institution pursuant to section 412:3-201, 412:3-202, 412:3-206, or
412:3-301;

(2) A nonrefundable fee of $9,000 for an application
for preliminary approval by the commissioner for the organization of a Hawaii
financial institution pursuant to section 412:5-402;

(3) A nonrefundable fee of $2,500 for a final
application for a charter or license to engage in the business of a Hawaii
financial institution pursuant to section 412:3-212;

(4) A nonrefundable fee of $10,000 for an application
for a merger or consolidation or acquisition of control involving a Hawaii
financial institution;

(5) A nonrefundable fee of $2,500 for an application
for the conversion of a federal financial institution to a Hawaii financial
institution or the conversion of a Hawaii financial institution to another
Hawaii financial institution charter;

(6) A nonrefundable fee of $5,000 for an application
of a bank to conduct a trust business through a subsidiary, division, or
department of the bank pursuant to section 412:5-205;

(7) A nonrefundable fee of $5,000 for an application
of a bank to conduct insurance activities pursuant to section 412:5-205.5;

(8) A nonrefundable fee of $5,000 for an application
of a bank to engage in securities activities pursuant to section 412:5-205.7;

(9) A nonrefundable fee of $2,000 for an application
for a bank, savings bank, or depository financial services loan company to
comply with lending limits applicable to federal financial institutions
pursuant to section 412:5-302, 412:6-303, or 412:9-404;

(10) A nonrefundable fee of $2,000 for an application
to exceed certain permitted investment limits pursuant to sections 412:5-305(f)
and (h), 412:6-306(f) and (h), 412:7-306(f) and (h), 412:8-301(f), 412:9-409(f)
and (i), and 412:10-502(g); and

(11) A nonrefundable fee of $2,500 for an application
to engage in the business of a credit union.

(d) The annual fee for each intra-Pacific
financial institution and interstate branch of out-of-state banks is the sum of
$1,000 for each office, agency, and branch office maintained by the financial
institution, payment of which shall be made before December 31 of each year.
The commissioner may establish, increase, decrease, or repeal this fee pursuant
to rules adopted in accordance with chapter 91.

(e) Intra-Pacific bank fees shall be as
follows:

(1) A nonrefundable fee of $9,000 to establish an
initial branch pursuant to section 412:5-401;

(2) A nonrefundable fee of $750 to establish an
additional branch or agency of an intra-Pacific bank; and

(3) A nonrefundable fee of $500 for an application to
relocate a branch or agency of an intra-Pacific bank established or acquired
pursuant to section 412:5-401.

(f) A nonrefundable fee of $500 shall be
assessed for an application to relocate a branch or office established pursuant
to section 412:12-107.

(g) A nonrefundable fee of $100 shall be
assessed for each certificate of good standing for any Hawaii financial
institution; provided that an additional fee of $100 shall be assessed for each
certificate of good standing that is requested to be provided in two business
days from receipt of request.

(h) All assessments and fees shall be
deposited into the compliance resolution fund established pursuant to section
26-9(o).

(i) For purposes of this section, "total
assets" means for an insured depository institution the total assets
reported in the financial institution's quarterly reports of condition, or call
reports, which are required to be filed pursuant to section 7(a)(3) of the
Federal Deposit Insurance Act or in the unaudited financial statements filed
pursuant to section 412:3-112.

(j) A Hawaii financial institution that fails
to make a payment required by this section shall be subject to an
administrative fine of not more than $250 per day for each day it is in
violation of this section, which fine, together with the amount due under this
section, may be recovered pursuant to section 412:2-611 and shall be deposited
into the compliance resolution fund established pursuant to section 26-9(o). [L
2013, c 172, §10; am L 2016, c 149, §2]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next